District of Columbia statutes.
2-710

Deposit of fines.

Money inuring to the District as a result of the fines imposed under § 2-708 shall be deposited in the Treasury of the United States to the credit of the District of Columbia or in any other depository designated by the Council.

History

Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-118, § 11, 23 DCR 8746

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1710.
1973 Ed., § 1-1710.